New York, session 2025-2026, A435.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 of section 3.03 of the arts 2 and cultural affairs law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2024 3 amending the arts and cultural affairs law relating to requiring the 4 council on the arts to have members from each of the ten regions of the 5 state, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 7296-A and A. 8978-A, 6 is amended to read as follows: 7 (c) The council on the arts shall not be out of compliance with this 8 section upon vacancy, and shall retain its full powers enumerated in 9 section 3.05 of this article, provided that[, to the extent practicable, 10 as each new successive vacancy occurs,] such vacancy is filled within a 11 reasonable time and the appointment made for such new vacancy shall move 12 the composition of the council closer to the requirement that each of 13 the ten regions of the state as defined by the empire state development 14 corporation be represented by at least one member of the council to the 15 extent practicable. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 17 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the arts and cultural 18 affairs law relating to requiring the council on the arts to have 19 members from each of the ten regions of the state, as proposed in legis- 20 lative bills numbers S. 7296-A and A. 8978-A, takes effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02726-01-5